sk-SK: Pokročilé funkcie mosta/smerovača: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Podpora režimu Bridge; Podpora hosťovskej siete; Systém prevencie vniknutia; Rodičovská kontrola; Podpora PoE; Podpora VPN; Iné
it: Funzionalità avanzate del bridge/router: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Supporto della modalità bridge; Supporto della rete ospite; Sistema anti-intrusione; Parental control; Supporto PoE; Supporto VPN; Altro
fi: Sillan/reitittimen lisäominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Siltatilan tuki; Vierasverkkotuki; Tunkeutumisen estojärjestelmä; Lapsilukko; PoE-tuki; VPN-tuki; Muu
hr-HR: Napredne značajke mosta/usmjernika: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Podrška za način rada mosta; Podrška za zasebnu mrežu; Sustav za sprječavanje upada; Roditeljska kontrola; Podrška za PoE; Podrška za VPN; Ostalo
el: Προηγμένες λειτουργίες γέφυρας/δρομολογητή: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Υποστήριξη λειτουργίας γέφυρας; Υποστήριξη δικτύου επισκεπτών; Σύστημα αποτροπής εισβολής; Γονικός έλεγχος; Υποστήριξη PoE; Υποστήριξη VPN; Άλλο
cs: Pokročilé funkce Bridge/Routeru: S umělou inteligencí; Podpora režimu Bridge; Podpora sítě pro hosty; Systém prevence vniknutí; Rodičovská kontrola; Podpora PoE; podpora VPN; Jiné
lt-LT: Išplėstinės tinklų tilto / maršruto parinktuvo funkcijos: Veikia DI pagrindu; Tiltinio sujungimo režimo palaikymas; Svečių tinklo palaikymas; Įsibrovimų prevencijos sistema; Tėvų kontrolė; PoE palaikymas; VPN palaikymas; Kita
ro-RO: Funcții avansate bridge/router: Pe bază de AI; Suport pentru modul Bridge; Asistență pentru rețeaua de vizitatori; Sistem de prevenire a intruziunilor; Control parental; Suport PoE; Suport VPN; Altele
fr: Fonctionnalités avancées du pont/routeur: Doté d’une IA; Prise en charge du mode pont; Prise en charge du réseau invité; Système de prévention des intrusions; Contrôle parental; Prise en charge PoE; Prise en charge des VPN; Autre
hu: Híd/Router speciális funkciói: AI-alapú; Áthidaló mód támogatása; Vendéghálózat támogatása; Behatolásgátló rendszer; Szülői felügyelet; PoE-támogatás; VPN-támogatás; Egyéb
pt-PT: Características avançadas de ponte/roteador: Alimentado por IA; Suporte ao modo Bridge; Suporte de rede para convidados; Sistema de prevenção de intrusões; Controlo parental; Suporte PoE; Suporte VPN; Outro
pt-BR: Recursos avançados de bridge/roteador: Com IA; Suporte para o modo Bridge; Suporte a rede convidada; Sistema de prevenção de intrusões; Controle dos pais; Suporte PoE; Suporte VPN; Outro
en: Bridge/Router advanced features: AI-powered; Bridge mode support; Guest network support; Intrusion prevention system; Parental control; PoE support; VPN support; Other
da: Avancerede funktioner for bridge/router: AI-drevet; support for bridgemode; Support for gæstenetværk; System til forebyggelse af indtrængen; Forældrekontrol; PoE-support; VPN-support; Andet
th: คุณลักษณะขั้นสูงของบริดจ์/เราเตอร์: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; รองรับโหมดบริดจ์; รองรับเครือข่ายของแขก; ระบบป้องกันการบุกรุก; การควบคุมโดยผู้ปกครอง; รองรับ PoE; รองรับ VPN; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Napredne funkcije mosta/usmerjevalnika: Poganja UI; Podpora za mostni način; Podpora gostujočega omrežja; Sistem za preprečevanje vdorov; Starševski nadzor; Podpora za PoE; VPN podpora; Drugo
bg-BG: Разширени функции на мост/рутер: Задвижван от AI; Поддръжка на мостов режим; Поддръжка на мрежа за гости; Система за предотвратяване на проникване; Родителски контрол; Поддръжка на PoE; Поддръжка на VPN; Други
pl: Zaawansowane funkcje mostka/routera: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Obsługa trybu mostka; Obsługa sieci gości; System zapobiegania włamaniom; Kontrola rodzicielska; Wsparcie PoE; Obsługa sieci VPN; Inne
ja: ブリッジ/ルーターの高度な機能: AI搭載; ブリッジモードサポート; ゲストネットワークサポート; 侵入防止システム; ペアレンタルコントロール; PoE対応; VPN対応; その他
ru: Дополнительные функции моста или маршрутизатора: На базе ИИ; Поддержка режима моста; Поддержка гостевой сети; Система предотвращения вторжений; Родительский контроль; Поддержка PoE; Поддержка VPN; Другое
zh-TW: 橋接器/路由器進階功能: AI 驅動; 支援橋接模式; 支援訪客網路; 防止入侵系統; 家長監護; PoE 支援; 支援 VPN; 其他
de: Erweiterte Bridge-/Router-Funktionen: KI-gestützt; Unterstützung des Überbrückungsmodus; Unterstützung von Gastnetzwerken; Intrusion Prevention System; Kindersicherung; PoE-Unterstützung; VPN-Unterstützung; Sonstiges
tr: Köprü/Yönlendiricinin gelişmiş özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Köprü modu desteği; Konuk ağ desteği; İzinsiz giriş önleme sistemi; Ebeveyn denetimi; PoE desteği; VPN desteği; Diğer
es: Características avanzadas del puente/enrutador: Con tecnología de IA; Compatible con modo puente; Compatible con red para invitados; Sistema de prevención de intrusiones; Control parental; Compatible con PoE; Compatible con VPN; Otros
vi: Các tính năng nâng cao của Bridge/Router: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Hỗ trợ chế độ cầu; Hỗ trợ mạng khách; Hệ thống ngăn chặn xâm nhập; Kiểm soát của cha mẹ; Hỗ trợ cấp nguồn qua Ethernet (PoE); Hỗ trợ VPN; Khác
zh-CN: 网桥/路由器高级功能: AI 赋能; 桥接模式支持; 访客网络支持; 入侵防御系统; 家长控制; PoE 支持; VPN 支持; 其他
sv: Avancerade funktioner brygga/router: AI-driven; Stöd för broläge; Support för gästnätverk; Inbrottsskyddssystem; Föräldrakontroll; PoE-stöd; VPN-stöd; Övrigt
nl: Geavanceerde functies brug/router: AI-aangedreven; Bridge modus-ondersteuning; Ondersteuning van gastnetwerken; Inbraakpreventiesysteem; Ouderlijk toezicht; PoE-ondersteuning; VPN-ondersteuning; Andere
nb: Bro/ruter avanserte funksjoner: KI-drevet; Støtte for bromodus; Støtte for gjestenettverk; Innbruddsforebyggende system; Foreldrekontroll; PoE-støtte; VPN-støtte; Annet
ko: 브리지/라우터 고급 기능: AI 기반; 브리지 모드 지원; 게스트 네트워크 지원; 침입 방지 시스템; 자녀 보호 기능; PoE 지원; VPN 지원; 기타